Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
37D

MANAGEMENT
OF FINANCING AGREEMENTS

Section

37D-1 Definitions

37D-2 Financing agreements

37D-3 Related agreements

37D-4 Inclusion of budget request

37D-5 Financing agreements not a general
obligation of State

37D-6 Federal tax-exempt status; preference;
protection

37D-7 Financing agreements legal investments

37D-8 Exemption from taxation

37D-9 Line of credit

37D-10 Litigation; jurisdiction; appeal

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2001, c 200, pt of §3.

Case Notes

Financing agreements entered into in accordance with this
chapter are not bonds as that term is used in article VII, §12 of Hawaii
constitution and thus do not count toward the debt ceiling of article VII,
§13. 85 H. 1, 936 P.2d 637.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next